Louisiana, session 2026, HB70.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:202.1(A)(introductory paragraph), (2), (3), and (6), (B), (C)(1),
and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§202.1. Residential contractor Contractor fraud; penalties
A. Residential contractor Contractor fraud is the misappropriation or
intentional taking of anything of value which belongs to another, either without the
consent of the other to the misappropriation or taking, or by means of fraudulent
conduct, practices, or representations by a person who has contracted to perform any
home building improvement or residential construction, or who has subcontracted
for the performance of any home building improvement or residential construction.
A misappropriation or intentional taking may be inferred when a person does any of
the following:
* * *
(2) Uses, or causes an agent or employee to use, any deception, false
pretense, or false promise to cause any person to enter into a contract for home
building improvements or residential construction.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-131 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 70
(3) Damages the property of any person with the intent to induce that person
to enter into a contract for home building improvements or residential construction.
* * *
(6) Fails to possess the required license for home building improvements or
residential construction required by applicable state, municipal, or parochial statute.
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, "home building improvement or residential
construction" means any alteration, repair, modification, construction, or other
improvement to any immovable or movable property primarily designed or used as
a residence or to any structure within the residence or upon the land adjacent to the
residence that meets the definition of "building" pursuant to R.S. 33:4771, regardless
of whether primarily designed or used as a residence or commercial property.
C.(1) When the misappropriation or intentional taking amounts to a value of
less than one thousand dollars, the offender shall be imprisoned for not more than six
months, or fined not more than one thousand dollars, or both. If the offender in such
cases has been convicted of theft or contractor fraud pursuant to this Section two or
more times previously, then upon conviction the offender shall be imprisoned, with
or without hard labor, for not more than two years, or fined not more than two
thousand dollars.
* * *
D.(1) In addition to the penalties provided in Subsection C of this Section,
a person convicted of residential contractor fraud shall be ordered to make full
restitution to the victim and any other person who has suffered a financial loss as a
result of the offense. For the purposes of this Subsection, restitution to the victim
shall include includes the cost of repairing work fraudulently performed by the
contractor and the cost of completing work for which the contractor was paid but did
not complete.
(2) A person sentenced under pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (C)(2),
(3), or (4) of this Section when the victim is sixty-five years of age or older and the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-131 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 70
property at issue is residential, in addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant
to this Section, shall be imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than
five years to be served concurrently with the sentence imposed.
* * *